Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-603
Veterans; mentally ill; jurisdiction of courts.

Jurisdiction is retained in the appropriate courts of this state to determine at any time the necessity for continuance of restraint as provided by law.

Laws 1947, c. 307, § 3, p. 937.